District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4311

Defamatory or injurious false statements against companies.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1132, ch. 672, ch. II, § 12
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 126(a), 48 DCR 1225
redesignated § 301, Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 20(b), 49 DCR 8140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-411.
1973 Ed., § 35-411.